Results/hyphyGenesToRun.txt
BPIFB1
CPB1
PGC
TRPM6
SLCA12
PTGFR
DHDH
NAGLU
ADGRF1
TET1
JAKMIP1
TULP4
ADCY1
CAMK2B
MYH13
TRPM5
EP400
VAX2
PLEKHF1
SORCS1
TARBP1
EHHADH
ACAA2
ACADM
ACAD11
ECI2
ALDH4A1
TAT
PTCD3
TEFM
ECSIT
FOXRED1
NDUFA9
TRMT9B
CYP2R1
CYP1A1
CYP26C1
TCTN1
CCDC66
CFAP43
SLC5A12
SLC16A5
B3GNT4
FANCM
WRN
ABCB11
CPT1C
GABRR1
STXBP1
GABRB3
RIMBP2
DGKI
PTK2B
MAPK8IP2
SHANK3
CACNG3
STY1
TRIO
PTEN
GRID
SDK1
TLN1
SHANK2
ADGRB1
SH3GL3
SCIN
CNTN4
TACR2
MYH2
COL6A2
KRT20
DOCK1
COL6A1
AP2A2
SERPINA1
ALB
ACY1
PBLD
IDO2
CTRC
TMED6
PNLIP
PLA2G1B
CUBN
CLDN16
TMEM52B
ENAM
UHRF1
TMEM121L
SPCL1
CRYZ
ATAD5
PLA2R1
PRTG
SLC12A8
ADO2
PRSS45P
TLE6
POLE
OTUD7A
CDR2L
TMEM132D
NBEA
RNF165
CAND2
KLHL30
NEB
FSD2
BNC1
TMPRSS11G
PARD6G
KRT80
TRIM29
TREX2
MC4R
PIRT
